Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1212.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 59 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter heading to read:SUBCHAPTER ADRUG SCREENING AND AWARENESS EDUCATIONSection 2. Section 5902(c) of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 5902. Urine drug screening requirement.* * *(c) Applicability.--The requirements of this [chapter] subchapter shall not apply if a health care practitioner of the 1234567891011121314151617 emergency department determines that a positive test result for fentanyl is due to a legally prescribed course of treatment for the patient. The health care practitioner shall denote this exception in the patient's medical record.* * *Section 3. Chapter 59 of Title 35 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER BFATHERHOOD ENGAGEMENT IN MATERNAL HEALTHSec.5911. Declaration of purpose.5912. Definitions.5913. Public awareness campaign on fatherhood engagement in maternal health.5914. Guidance to maternal care providers on encouraging fatherhood engagement in maternal health.5915. Report.§ 5911. Declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Fatherhood engagement can play an important role in improving maternal health care, addressing maternal mortality and morbidity and bettering the development and long-term growth of a child.(2) The participation of the father during prenatal care appointments provides CAN PROVIDE the mother with additional support to recognize potential pregnancy-related complications that could lead to maternal mortality and morbidity.(3) When the father is involved during pregnancy appointments and milestones, the mother is one and one-half 20250HB1212PN1935 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 times more likely to receive prenatal care in the first trimester, which improves health outcomes for both the mother and baby.(4) The support of the father during pregnancy can help promote the behavioral health of the mother.(5) (3) Fatherhood engagement reduces CAN REDUCE the risks of postpartum mood and anxiety disorders and contributes to a lower likelihood of a preterm birth and a higher likelihood of a healthier birth weight. (6) Including fathers in conversations about safe sleep guidelines and sharing guidance about infant crying and the risks of shaken baby syndrome can help reduce infant deaths.(7) (4) Active support of the father during breastfeeding greatly increases CAN INCREASE the chances of successful breastfeeding, which improves the physical and mental health of the baby and the mother. (8) (5) Physical contact between the father and the baby just after birth and in the months following birth has been shown to improve the health and development of the baby, improve the mental health of the father and foster father-child bonding in the short term and long term.§ 5912. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Birth center." As defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Health care facility." As defined in section 103 of the 20250HB1212PN1935 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Health Care Facilities Act."Health care practitioner." As defined in section 103 of the Health Care Facilities Act."Hospital." As defined in section 802.1 of the Health Care Facilities Act.§ 5913 . Public awareness campaign on fatherhood engagement in maternal health.(a) Duties.-- No SUBJECT TO FUNDING BEING AVAILABLE, NO later than two years after the effective date of this subsection , the department shall conduct a public awareness campaign to increase the understanding of fatherhood engagement in improving overall health outcomes during pregnancy, childbirth and postpartum for both the mother and baby. (b) Contents.--The department shall ensure that the public awareness campaign under subsection (a) includes all of the following:(1) M essaging intended to provide information to the public about the importance of a father's role in pregnancy and parenting.(2) R esources and information to counter popular narratives that minimize the importance of engaged and involved fathers in pregnancy and parenting.(3) R esources and information that promote awareness about the impact of father inclusion on maternal and infant outcomes, including all of the following:(i) T he importance of father-to-infant skin-to-skin contact in improving the health and development of a newborn and fostering father-child bonding in the short term and long term.(ii) T he role of the father in promoting the 20250HB1212PN1935 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 behavioral health of the mother.(iii) T he role of the father in increasing the number of prenatal and postpartum appointments the mother attends.(iv) The effects of father attendance during prenatal and postnatal appointments.(v) The effects of paternal postpartum depression.(vi) The role of father support in improving rates of successful breastfeeding.(vii) T he role of father involvement in providing the mother with additional support to recognize potential pregnancy-related complications, including all of the following:(A) P reeclampsia. (B) P eripartum cardiomyopathy. (C) P reterm labor. (D) P erinatal mood and anxiety disorders. (E) P regnancy loss or miscarriage. (F) S tillbirth. (G) H igh blood pressure. (H) C ervical infections. (I) G estational diabetes. (J) P lacental abruption. (K) E ctopic pregnancy. (L) U terine rupture. (2) R ESOURCES AND INFORMATION THAT PROMOTE AWARENESS ABOUT THE IMPACT OF FATHER INCLUSION ON MATERNAL AND INFANT OUTCOMES.§ 5914. Guidance to maternal care providers on encouraging fatherhood engagement in maternal health.20250HB1212PN1935 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Duties of department.-- No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall post materials on the department's publicly accessible Internet website that address how a provider of maternity care, including a hospital, health care facility, birth center , other maternity care provider, managed care organization or other health insurance provider OR HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER, can provide training and education to a health care practitioner about the benefits of fatherhood engagement in improving overall health outcomes during pregnancy, childbirth and postpartum for both the mother and baby . (b) Contents.--The department shall ensure that the materials under subsection (a) include all of the following:(1) I nformation on how a health care practitioner can do all of the following:(i) O ffer peer-to-peer, father-to-father encouragement, support and education in communities that traditionally are not inclusive of fathers.(ii) P rovide a father with information on all of the following:(A) W hat to expect before, during and after the birth process.(B) H ow to better understand and support the mother throughout the birth process and serve as an advocate in her care.(C) Recommendations and protocol regarding pregnancy care, postpartum care and child care, including all of the following:(I) M aternal, infant and routine childhood vaccines.20250HB1212PN1935 - 6 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) M aternal warning signs. (III) T he importance of fetal movement counting.(IV) Maternal mental health and postpartum recovery.(V) Breastfeeding practices.(VI) Health care appointments.(VII) S afe sleep practices. (VIII) Skin-to-skin contact.(IX) Baby care, including safe soothing of a crying baby.(X) Child bonding.(XI) Early childhood development.(iii) S creen fathers for depression and provide referrals for treatment that may positively impact child development and reduce the risk of adverse childhood experiences.(2) Information addressing cultural beliefs about fatherhood, a man's role in maternal health and families.(3) A statement reaffirming a father's ability to play a positive and valuable role during pregnancy, birth and early childhood development, regardless of race or ethnicity.(B) SCREENING FOR PATERNAL DEPRESSION.-- THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENCOURAGE AND PROMOTE THE INCLUSION OF PATERNAL DEPRESSION SCREENING BY PROVIDERS OF MATERNITY CARE AS PART OF CARE PROVIDED DURING PREGNANCY, CHILDBIRTH AND POSTPARTUM FOR BOTH THE MOTHER AND BABY.§ 5915. Report.No later than six FOUR years after the effective date of this section, the Joint State Government Commission shall conduct a 20250HB1212PN1935 - 7 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 study on the implementation of this chapter and submit a report on the study to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1212PN1935 - 8 - 123456